District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.12

Compensation for members of the Public Employee Relations Board.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, members of the Public Employee Relations Board shall receive compensation at the rate of $250 per day, or $31.25 per hour, whichever is less, while in the service of the said Board. Should a member serve in excess of 8 hours on a particular day, such member may be paid additional compensation for such period of service, to a maximum of 2 per diem payments for any consecutive 24-hour period.

(b)

During the transition period a person serving on both the Board of Labor Relations and the Public Employee Relations Board shall receive compensation as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

Adjustments to the rate of compensation provided in this section shall be made in accordance with § 1-611.08(b).

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1112, 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(m), (n), 27 DCR 2632

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-605.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-612.12.
1973 Ed., § 1-341.12.